North Dakota, session 69, SB2013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys from special funds, to the commissioner of university
and school lands for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the commissioner of university and
school lands, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $8,005,331 $1,835,598 $9,840,929
New and vacant FTE pool 0 419,754 419,754
Operating expenses 1,763,694 (164,362) 1,599,332
Contingencies 100,000 0 100,000
Total special funds $9,869,025 $2,090,990 $11,960,015
Full-time equivalent positions 33.00 1.00 34.00
SECTION 2. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
commissioner of university and school lands may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant
FTE pool line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to
transfer funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in
accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved
by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 3. DISTRIBUTIONS TO STATE INSTITUTIONS. Pursuant to article IX of the Constitution
of North Dakota, the board of university and school lands shall distribute during the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, from the permanent funds managed for
the benefit of the following entities:
Common schools $584,677,350
North Dakota state university 8,770,000
University of North Dakota 6,948,000
Youth correctional center 3,136,000
School for the deaf 2,388,000
North Dakota state college of science 2,570,284
State hospital 1,976,284
Veterans' home 994,284
Valley City state university 1,566,000
North Dakota vision services - school for the blind 1,936,284
Mayville state university 1,102,000
Dakota college at Bottineau 406,284
Dickinson state university 406,284
Minot state university 406,284
Total $617,283,338
SECTION 4. REVENUE DIVERSIFICATION AND DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES -
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE - REPORT. During the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027, the commissioner of university and school lands and the commissioner of commerce

S. B. NO. 2013 - PAGE 2
shall collaborate to identify revenue diversification and development opportunities on trust lands. The
commissioner of university and school lands shall report to the appropriations committees of the
seventieth legislative assembly on the results of the collaboration to identify revenue diversification and
development opportunities.

S. B. NO. 2013 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2013.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 67 Nays 22 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State